Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 7. MENTAL HEALTH AND INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

SUBTITLE A. SERVICES FOR PERSONS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS OR AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

CHAPTER 532A. GENERAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO DEPARTMENT OF AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES

Sec. 532A.001. DEFINITIONS; INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY COMPONENTS OF DEPARTMENT. (a) In this chapter:

(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of aging and disability services.

(2) "Department" means the Department of Aging and Disability Services.

(b) The department includes community services operated by the department and the following facilities:

(1) the central office of the department;

(2) the Abilene State Supported Living Center;

(3) the Austin State Supported Living Center;

(4) the Brenham State Supported Living Center;

(5) the Corpus Christi State Supported Living Center;

(6) the Denton State Supported Living Center;

(7) the Lubbock State Supported Living Center;

(8) the Lufkin State Supported Living Center;

(9) the Mexia State Supported Living Center;

(10) the Richmond State Supported Living Center;

(11) the San Angelo State Supported Living Center;

(12) the San Antonio State Supported Living Center; and

(13) the El Paso State Supported Living Center.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1334, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 532A.002. MEDICAL DIRECTOR. (a) The commissioner shall appoint a medical director.

(b) To be qualified for appointment as the medical director under this section, a person must:

(1) be a physician licensed to practice in this state; and

(2) have proven administrative experience and ability in comprehensive health care or human service operations.

(c) The medical director reports to the commissioner and is responsible for the following duties under this title:

(1) oversight of the quality and appropriateness of clinical services delivered in state supported living centers or under contract to the department in relation to intellectual disability services; and

(2) leadership in physician recruitment and retention and peer review.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1334, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 532A.003. HEADS OF STATE SUPPORTED LIVING CENTERS. (a) The commissioner shall appoint the head of each state supported living center the department administers.

(b) The head of a state supported living center serves at the will of the commissioner.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1334, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 532A.004. ADVISORY COMMITTEES. (a) The executive commissioner shall appoint any advisory committees the executive commissioner considers necessary to assist in the effective administration of the department's intellectual disability programs.

(b) The department may reimburse committee members for travel costs incurred in performing their duties as provided by Section 2110.004, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1334, eff. April 2, 2015.